bilingual/bag_rus.lexd
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# MAIN PATTERNS
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
PATTERNS
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NUMBERS
#
rootOne[norm] agrFinal[-Hpl,-Npl] UCl?
singles UCl?
decimal UCl? # аца
centi UCl? # бешен
DaSuffixedNums UCl?
#
#forms with links
#
decLinks UCl? # ацал, link in 11-19
rootDec conjDec UCl? # ац, link in 21-29
centi conjCentMil UCl? 
milli conjCentMil UCl? # links in 101-199, 10001-1999
#
#nominalized cardinal numbers
#
singles DatExceptions[-OblPlRu,-OblPlDu] NCl?
DaSuffixedNums DatExceptions[-OblPlRu,-OblPlDu] NCl?
NomNumbersAgr CasesGenAgr NCl?
NomNumbersNonAgr CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
#
#collective numbers
#
singles col 
decimal col 
DaSuffixedNums col
#
#ordinal numbers
#
rootOne[ord]
OrdNumbersSer1 agrFinal
OrdNumbersSer2
#
#nominalized ordinals
#
OrdNumbersSer1 agrFinal CaseMain[nullNom] NCl?
OrdNumbersSer1 OblAdjAgr CasesGenAgr NCl?
OrdNumbersSer1 OblAdjNonAgr CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
OrdNumbersSer1 OblAdjDative NCl?
OrdNumbersSer1 OblAdjSup NCl?
#
#distributional numbers
#
rootOne[red] agrFinal # цецеб = 1
rootCent centDist [<*>:] cent end[DaNumber]?
rootCent milDist [<*>:] mil end[DaNumber]?
decDist [:гь]? dec ( end[DaNumber] | end[RaNumber] ) # гьабдигьабда = 10
2xRootInit[excl] # 2
2xRootInit[-excl,DaNumber] end[DaNumber]
2xRootInit[-excl,RaNumber] end[RaNumber]
2xRootDec [<*>:] dec end?
#
# multiplicative numerals
#
rootOne[norm] multSuffix[norm]
rootInit multSuffix[norm]
rootOne[norm] multSuffix[alt] end
rootInit multSuffix[alt] end
decimal multSuffix[alt] end
milli multSuffix[alt] end
centi multSuffix[alt] end
DaSuffixedNums multSuffix[large]
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ADJECTIVE
agrInitial adjNoDeclAgr UCl?
adjNoDecl UCl?
#adjective agreement
#
agrInitial adjDouble agrFinal UCl? # can agree with 2 heads, see Kibrik et al.
adjSingle agrFinal UCl?
#
#nominalized adjectives
#double
agrInitial[Msg] adjDouble agrFinal[Msg] AddCasesMsg NCl?
agrInitial[Fsg] adjDouble agrFinal[Fsg] AddCasesFNsg NCl?
agrInitial[Nsg] adjDouble agrFinal[Nsg] AddCasesFNsg NCl?
agrInitial[Hpl] adjDouble agrFinal[Hpl] AddCasesHpl NCl?
agrInitial[Npl] adjDouble agrFinal[Npl] AddCasesNpl NCl?
agrInitial[Msg] adjDouble agrFinal[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr NCl?
agrInitial[Fsg] adjDouble agrFinal[Fsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
agrInitial[Nsg] adjDouble agrFinal[Nsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
agrInitial[Hpl] adjDouble agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] CasesGenAgr NCl?
agrInitial[Npl] adjDouble agrFinal[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
#single
adjSingle agrFinal CaseMain[nullNom] NCl?
adjSingle OblAdjAgr CasesGenAgr NCl?
adjSingle OblAdjNonAgr CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
adjSingle OblAdjDative NCl? 
adjSingle OblAdjSup NCl?
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# PRONOUN
#personal pronouns
#
PerPronounStems genitiveCase[GenAgr] NCl?
PerPronounStems[PrExc] [<obl>:] CaseMain[ErgR,-RegErg,-nullNom] NCl?
PerPronounStems[PrExc] [<obl>:] DatExcMin[pron] NCl?
PerPronounStems[PrExc] [<obl>:] SupExcMin[pron] NCl?
PerPronounStems[-PrExc] CaseMain[nullNom] NCl?
PerPronounStems[-PrExc] [<obl>:] CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] NCl?
PerPronounExc NCl?
PerPronounStems [<obl>:] locMain directCase NCl?
#
#demonstrative pronouns
#
DemPronoun agrFinal CaseMain[nullNom] NCl?
#
#adverbial pronouns
#
DemPronoun [:гьи]? agrMiddle AdvPronAffix
# vocab plurals
DemPronoun agrFinal[Npl] OblSingular[OblU] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[-GenAgr] ) NCl? # o-r-u , see vocab, 580
DemPronoun agrFinal[Npl] OblSingular[OblU] locMain directCase NCl?
DemPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[GenAgr] ) NCl? # o-ba-lu- , see vocab, 580
DemPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] locMain directCase NCl?
# Kibrik plurals
DemPronoun OblAdjPlural[OblPlRu] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[GenAgr] ) NCl?
DemPronoun ( DatExceptions[OblPlRu] | SupExceptions[OblPlRu] ) NCl?
DemPronoun OblAdjPlural[OblPlRi] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[-GenAgr] ) NCl?
DemPronoun ( OblAdjPlural[OblPlRu] | OblAdjPlural[OblPlRi] ) locMain directCase NCl?
# F / N sg
DemPronoun ( OblAdjSingular[OblFLi] | OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] ) ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[-GenAgr] ) NCl?
DemPronoun LiFusion NCl?
DemPronoun ( OblAdjSingular[OblFLi] | OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] ) locMain directCase NCl?
# M sg
DemPronoun OblAdjSingular[OblSu] ( CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom] | genitiveCase[GenAgr] ) NCl?
DemPronoun ( DatExceptions[OblSu] | SupExceptions[OblSu] ) NCl?
DemPronoun OblAdjSingular[OblSu] locMain directCase NCl?
#
#logophoric pronouns + reflexive pronouns, see Kibrik et al. 162-163
#
LogPronoun[nom] agrFinal CaseMain[nullNom] RefSuffix? NCl?
# F / N sg
LogPronoun[obl] ( OblAdjSingular[OblFLi] | OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] ) CasesGenNonAgr RefSuffix? NCl?
LogPronoun[obl] LiFusion RefSuffix? NCl?
# M sg 
LogPronoun[obl] OblAdjSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr RefSuffix? NCl?
LogPronoun[obl] ( DatExceptions[OblSu] | SupExceptions[OblSu] ) RefSuffix? NCl?
# plurals
LogPronoun[obl] OblAdjPlural[OblPlDu] CasesGenAgr RefSuffix? NCl?
LogPronoun[obl] ( DatExceptions[OblPlDu] | SupExceptions[OblPlDu] ) RefSuffix? NCl?
LogPronoun[obl] OblAdjPlural[OblPlDiri] CasesGenNonAgr RefSuffix? NCl?
#
#interrogative & negative pronouns
#
InterPronounExc PronModifiers? # nominative, see Kibrik et al, 164 & vocab, 580
InterPronoun[H] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
InterPronoun[H] DatExcMin[pron] PronModifiers? NCl?
InterPronoun[N] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
#which pronoun
WhichPronoun ( agrInitial[Msg] | ( agrInitial[Fsg] | agrInitial[Nsg] ) ) WhichInfix[sg] CaseMain[nullNom] PronModifiers? NCl?
WhichPronoun ( agrInitial[Hpl] | agrInitial[Npl] ) WhichInfix[pl] CaseMain[nullNom] PronModifiers? NCl?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Msg] WhichInfix[sg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Fsg] WhichInfix[sg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Nsg] WhichInfix[sg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Hpl] WhichInfix[pl] OblPlural[OblPlU] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Npl] WhichInfix[pl] OblPlural[OblPlU] CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
WhichPronoun agrInitial[Msg] WhichInfix[sg] ( DatExcMin[-OblPlLu,-OblPlAlu,-pron] | ( SupExcMin[-OblPlLu,-OblPlAlu] directCase ) )
#number interrogative
NumPronoun CaseMain[nullNom] PronModifiers? NCl?
NumPronoun OblAdjSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
NumPronoun ( OblAdjSingular[OblFLi] | OblAdjSingular[OblNLi] ) CasesGenNonAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
NumPronoun OblAdjPlural[OblPlAlu] CasesGenAgr PronModifiers? NCl?
NumPronoun ( DatExceptions[OblSu] | ( DatExceptions[OblFLi] | DatExceptions[OblNLi] ) ) PronModifiers? NCl?
NumPronoun ( SupExceptions[OblSu] | ( SupExceptions[OblFLi] | SupExceptions[OblNLi] ) ) PronModifiers? NCl?
NumPronounExc[sup] directCase NCl?
NumPronounExc[-sup] NCl?
#"Each" pronoun
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] EachInfix agrMiddle[Msg] AddCasesMsg NCl?
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] EachInfix agrMiddle[Fsg] AddCasesFNsg NCl?
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] EachInfix agrMiddle[Nsg] AddCasesFNsg NCl?
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] EachInfix agrMiddle[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr NCl?
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] EachInfix agrMiddle[Fsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
EachPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] EachInfix agrMiddle[Nsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
#Interrogative adjective pronoun 
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Msg] AddCasesMsg NCl?
InterAdjPronoun ( agrFinal[Fsg] | agrFinal[Nsg] ) AddCasesFNsg NCl?
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr NCl?
InterAdjPronoun ( agrFinal[Fsg] | agrFinal[Nsg] ) OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] AddCasesHpl NCl?
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Npl] AddCasesNpl NCl?
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] CasesGenAgr NCl?
InterAdjPronoun agrFinal[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
#indef pronoun ser. #2
InterPronounExc[Hsg] ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Msg] | AltIndefPronounSuffix[Fsg] ) NCl?
InterPronounExc[Nsg] AltIndefPronounSuffix[Nsg] NCl?
InterPronounExc[Hsg] AltIndefPronounSuffix[Hpl] NCl?
InterPronounExc[Npl] AltIndefPronounSuffix[Npl] NCl?
InterPronoun[H] CasesGenAgr ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Hpl] | ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Msg] | AltIndefPronounSuffix[Fsg] ) ) NCl?
InterPronoun[H] DatExcMin[pron] ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Hpl] | ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Msg] | AltIndefPronounSuffix[Fsg] ) ) NCl?
InterPronoun[H] SupExcMin[pron] directCase ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Hpl] | ( AltIndefPronounSuffix[Msg] | AltIndefPronounSuffix[Fsg] ) ) NCl?
InterPronoun[N] OblSingular[OblNLi] CasesGenNonAgr AltIndefPronounSuffix[Nsg] NCl?
InterPronoun[N] ( DatExcMin[OblLi] | ( SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase ) ) AltIndefPronounSuffix[Nsg] NCl?
InterPronoun[N] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr AltIndefPronounSuffix[Npl] NCl?
InterPronoun[N] ( DatExcMin[OblLi] | ( SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase ) ) AltIndefPronounSuffix[Npl] NCl?
#anypronoun
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Msg] AddCasesMsg NCl?
AnyPronoun ( agrFinal[Fsg] | agrFinal[Nsg] ) AddCasesFNsg NCl?
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr NCl?
AnyPronoun ( agrFinal[Fsg] | agrFinal[Nsg] ) OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] AddCasesHpl NCl?
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Npl] AddCasesNpl NCl?
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu] CasesGenAgr NCl?
AnyPronoun agrFinal[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
#allpronoun
agrInitial[Msg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] AddCasesMsg DaPostfix
agrInitial[Fsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] AddCasesFNsg DaPostfix
agrInitial[Nsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] AddCasesFNsg DaPostfix
agrInitial[Hpl] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Hpl] AddCasesHpl DaPostfix
agrInitial[Nsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Npl] AddCasesNpl DaPostfix
agrInitial[Msg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr DaPostfix
agrInitial[Fsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Fsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr DaPostfix
agrInitial[Nsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Nsg] OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr DaPostfix
agrInitial[Hpl] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Hpl] OblSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr DaPostfix
agrInitial[Nsg] AllPronoun agrMiddle[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr DaPostfix
#universal ser. #3, see Kibrik et al. 166
InterPronounExc[Hsg] IndefPronounSuffix ( AddCasesMsg | AddCasesFNsg ) NCl?
InterPronounExc[Hsg] IndefPronounSuffix OblAdjSingular[OblSu] CasesGenAgr NCl?
InterPronounExc[Hsg] IndefPronounSuffix OblAdjSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr NCl?
InterPronounExc[Nsg] IndefPronounSuffix ( OblSingular[OblLi] CasesGenNonAgr | AddCasesFNsg ) NCl?
InterPronounExc[Npl] IndefPronounSuffix ( OblAdjPlural[OblPlLi] CasesGenNonAgr | AddCasesNpl ) NCl?
#Misc. pronouns
HowMuchPronoun agrFinal NCl?
HowPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )? NCl?
WhenPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )? NCl?
NumPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )? NCl?
LocPronoun ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )? NCl?
InterAdjPronoun agrMiddle ( AltIndefPronounSuffix | PronModifiers )? NCl?
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
